Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6322
Firm; license; qualifications.

To qualify for a license, a firm shall:

(1) Own or demonstrate immediate and continuing access to and maintain in operable condition modern and effective equipment, as prescribed by the department, which is designed for use in abatement projects;

(2) Ensure that each employee or agent of the firm who will participate in an abatement project is licensed as required by the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act;

(3) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the firm is capable of complying with all applicable requirements, procedures, and standards pertaining to abatement projects; and

(4) Meet any other standards which the department may deem necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of all classes of lead-based paint professions and the general public.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 170;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1275.